Hawaii statutes.
§142-8 Notification of arrival. The
captain of any vessel or aircraft transporting any live animal to any port in
this State shall immediately upon arrival in the State notify the department of
agriculture. No animal so transported, nor any portion of the food or water
nor any effects connected therewith or provided for the animal's use during
transit, shall be removed from the wharf or airport until the department has
inspected and passed the same. The department, at the owner's or shipper's
expense, may require that the animal be moved to a more suitable location for
inspection. [L 1882, c 34, §3; am L 1884, c 29, §1; RL 1925, §614; RL 1935,
§209; RL 1945, §1059; RL 1955, §20-9; am L Sp 1959 2d, c 1, §22; am L 1961, c
132, §2; HRS §142-8; am L 1986, c 266, §1]

Previous
Vol02_Ch0046-0115
Next